Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-404 Formal testacy
proceedings; written objections to probate. Any party to a formal
proceeding who opposes the probate of a will for any reason shall state in the
party's pleadings the party's objections to probate of the will. [L 1996, c
288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next